Washington statutes.
RCW 30A.04.180

Dividends.

No bank shall declare or pay any dividend to an amount greater than its retained earnings, without approval from the director. The director shall in his or her discretion have the power to require any bank to suspend the payment of any and all dividends until all requirements that may have been made by the director shall have been complied with; and upon such notice to suspend dividends no bank shall thereafter declare or pay any dividends until such notice has been rescinded in writing. A dividend is payable in cash, property, or capital stock, but the restrictions on the payment of a dividend (other than restrictions imposed by the director pursuant to his or her authority to require the suspension of the payment of any or all dividends) do not apply to a dividend payable by the bank solely in its own capital stock. For purposes of this section, "retained earnings" shall be determined by generally accepted accounting principles.

[ 2014 c 37 s 117. Prior: 1994 c 256 s 35; 1994 c 92 s 17; 1986 c 279 s 8; 1981 c 89 s 1; 1969 c 136 s 2; 1955 c 33 s 30.04.180; prior: 1933 c 42 s 7; 1931 c 11 s 1; 1917 c 80 s 33; RRS s 3240. Formerly RCW 30.04.180.]

NOTES:

Findings—Construction—1994 c 256: See RCW 43.320.007.

Severability—1981 c 89: "If any provision of this act or its application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other persons or circumstances is not affected." [ 1981 c 89 s 8.]